ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Splittere și comutatoare audio și video > Splittere și switch-uri video component: Splittere video component; Switch-uri video component
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > AV 分配器/切換器 > 色差端子分配器與切換器: 色差端子分配器; 色差端子切換器
hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Audio- és videoelosztók és -kapcsolók > Komponens videóelosztók és -kapcsolók: Komponens videóelosztók; Komponens videókapcsolók
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Kabeldelare och omkopplare för video och ljud > Komponentvideofördelare och omkopplare: Komponentvideofördelare; Komponentvideoomkopplare
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Garso ir vaizdo skirstytuvai ir jungikliai > Komponentiniai vaizdo įrašų skirstytuvai ir jungikliai: Komponentiniai vaizdo įrašų skirstytuvai; Komponentiniai vaizdo įrašų jungikliai
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Avdio in video razdelilniki in preklopniki > Komponentni video razdelilniki in preklopniki: Komponentni video razdelilniki; Komponentni video preklopniki
en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Audio & Video Splitters & Switches > Component Video Splitters & Switches: Component Video Splitters; Component Video Switches
ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 오디오 및 비디오 스플리터/스위치 > 컴포넌트 비디오 스플리터 및 스위치: 컴포넌트 비디오 스플리터; 컴포넌트 비디오 스위치
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Διαχωριστές & διακόπτες ήχου & βίντεο > Διαχωριστές & διακόπτες συνιστωσών βίντεο: Διαχωριστές συνιστωσών βίντεο; Διακόπτες συνιστωσών βίντεο
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Audio-/videosplitters en -schakelaars > Component video splitters en switches: Component video splitters; Component video switches
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Splitters e interrutores de áudio e vídeo > Divisores e comutadores de vídeo componente: Divisores de vídeo componente; Comutadores de vídeo componente
da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Lyd og video – fordelere og omskiftere > Komponentvideo – fordelere og omskiftere: Komponentvideo – fordelere; Komponentvideo – fordelere
hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Audio i video razdjelnici i sklopke > Komponentni videorazdjelnici i prekidači: Komponentni videorazdjelnici; Komponentni videoprekidači
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Divisores e comutadores de áudio e vídeo > Divisores e chaves de vídeo componente: Divisores de vídeo componente; Chaves de vídeo componente
tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Ses ve Görüntü Ayırıcıları ve Anahtarları > Component Video Bölücüler ve Anahtarlar: Component Video Bölücüler; Component Video Anahtarlar
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Divisores y conmutadores de audio y vídeo > Divisores y conmutadores de video por componentes: Divisores de video por componentes; Conmutadores de video por componentes
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > สวิตช์และตลับแยก AV > ตัวแยกและสวิตช์วิดีโอคอมโพเนนต์: ตัวแยกสัญญาณวิดีโอคอมโพเนนต์; สวิตช์วิดีโอคอมโพเนนต์
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Répartiteurs et commutateurs audio et vidéo > Répartiteurs et commutateurs vidéo composante: Répartiteurs vidéo composante; Commutateurs vidéo composante
sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Rozbočovače a prepínače zvuku a videa > Komponentové video rozdeľovače a prepínače: Komponentové video rozdeľovače; Komponentové video prepínače
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 音频和视频分配器和切换器 > 分量视频分路器和切换器: 分量视频分路器; 分量视频切换器
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Bộ chia và công tắc âm thanh và hình ảnh > Bộ tách và công tắc video thành phần: Bộ tách video thành phần; Công tắc video thành phần
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Lyd- og videosplittere og -brytere > Komponentvideo-splittere og -brytere: Komponentvideo-splittere; Komponentvideo-brytere
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > AV-jakajat ja -kytkimet > Komponenttivideojakajat ja -kytkimet: Komponenttivideojakajat; Komponenttivideokytkimet
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > AVスプリッター・スイッチ > コンポーネントビデオスプリッター・スイッチャー: コンポーネントビデオスプリッター; コンポーネントビデオスイッチャー
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Аудио- и видеосплитери и превключватели > Компонентни видео сплитери и превключватели: Компонентни видео сплитери; Компонентни видео превключватели
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Splitter e interruttori audio e video > Splitter e switch video component: Splitter video component; Switch video component
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Разветвители и коммутаторы аудио- и видеосигналов > Разветвители и переключатели компонентного видео: Разветвители компонентного видео; Переключатели компонентного видео
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Rozdzielacze i przełączniki do przesyłania obrazu i dźwięku > Rozdzielacze i przełączniki wideo komponentu: Rozdzielacze wideo komponentu; Przełączniki wideo komponentu
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > AV rozbočovače a přepínače > Komponentní video rozbočovače a přepínače: Komponentní video rozbočovače; Komponentní video přepínače
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Audio- und Video-Splitter & -Switches > Component-Video-Splitter und -Switches: Component-Video-Splitter; Component-Video-Switches